Vermont statutes. Title 19 Highways
Subchapter 1. General Provisions

§ 701.
Definitions.

As used in this chapter:

“Acceptance” means receipt of the right-of-way needed for a new highway, in some cases this may include a completed roadway.

“Altered” means a major physical change in the highway such as a change in width from a single lane to two lanes.

“Classification” means the categorization of all town highways pursuant to section 302 of this title.

“Discontinued” means a previously designated town highway which through the process of discontinuance all public rights are reconveyed to the adjoining landowners.

“Dedication” means the process of selecting a right-of-way or an alignment for a highway.

“Interested person” or “person interested in lands” means a person who has a legal interest of record in the property affected.

“Landowner” means a person who has title to real estate in fee simple or a life estate.

“Lay out” means the legal procedure establishing the alignment or right-of-way of a highway.

“Reclassify” means to change the classification of a highway using the legal process described in this chapter.

HISTORY:

Added

1985, No. 269

(Adj. Sess.), § 1; amended

2021, No. 20

, § 96.

§ 702.
Width of highways and trails.

The right-of-way for each highway and trail shall be three rods wide unless otherwise properly recorded.
Any highway that had been designated as a trail prior to July 1, 1967 and later becomes a trail shall retain the same width of right-of-way as a trail as it had as a highway, but not exceeding three rods.

HISTORY:

Added

1985, No. 269

(Adj. Sess.), § 1.

§ 703.
Widening of highways.

If the width of a highway as laid out is less than the law or the public convenience requires, the selectboard may widen the highway accordingly.
Persons whose lands are taken or are damaged shall be entitled to compensation.

HISTORY:

Added

1985, No. 269

(Adj. Sess.), § 1.

§ 704.
Survey and boundaries.

When selectmen accept, lay out, or alter a highway, as provided in this chapter, they shall cause a survey to be made in accordance with the provisions of section 33 of this title and shall mark each termination of the survey by a permanent monument or boundary or refer the termination or survey by course and distance, to some neighboring permanent monument. The survey shall describe the highway and the right-of-way by courses, distances, and width, and shall describe the monuments and boundaries.

HISTORY:

Added

1985, No. 269

(Adj. Sess.), § 1; amended

1993, No. 195

(Adj. Sess.), § 3.

§ 705.
Papers to be recorded.

A copy of any order of a court establishing, altering, or discontinuing a highway, together with a survey of so much of the road as is in any one town, certified by the clerk of the court, shall be recorded in the office of the town clerk.

HISTORY:

Added

1985, No. 269

(Adj. Sess.), § 1.

§ 706.
Duties of commissioners appointed by the Supreme or Superior Court.

Any commissioners appointed by the Supreme or Superior Court to build or repair a bridge or lay out, alter, or discontinue a highway may order the town or towns, in or through which they lay out or alter a highway, to grade the hills to such inclination as they deem proper and to gravel the portions they deem necessary.
The commissioners shall estimate the expense and report to the court.
The court may accept or reject the report in whole or in part and order the town or towns to gravel portions of the highway and to grade the hills in the manner and to the extent it deems proper.

HISTORY:

Added

1985, No. 269

(Adj. Sess.), § 1.

§ 707.
Powers of Supreme and Superior Courts.

Upon petition for that purpose as in case of laying out, altering, or discontinuing a highway, and by similar proceedings, the Supreme or Superior Court may order hills to be graded and surfaces to be graveled on existing highways under the provisions of section 706 of this title.

HISTORY:

Added

1985, No. 269

(Adj. Sess.), § 1.